Alabama, session 2026rs, SB159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 40-21-83 and 40-21-103 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§40-21-83
There are specifically excluded from the gross receipts
or gross sales of a utility, all revenues derived from any of
the following:
(1) The furnishing of utility services which the State
of Alabama is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or
laws of the United States of America or the Constitution of
the State of Alabama of 2022.
(2) The furnishing of utility services which are
otherwise taxed under Sections 40-23-1 to 40-23-36, inclusive.
(3) Wholesale sales.
(4) The furnishing of electricity, natural gas, or
domestic water for use or consumption by, in, or for the
direct production, generation, processing, storage, delivery,
or transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water.
Page 1

water.
SB159 Enrolled
(5) The furnishing of electricity to a manufacturer or
compounder for use in an electrolytic or electrothermal
manufacturing or compounding process.
(6) The furnishing of natural gas to a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy.
(7) The furnishing of natural gas to be used by a
manufacturer or compounder to chemically convert raw materials
prior to the use of the converted raw materials in an
electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing or compounding
process.
(8) The use or consumption of electricity by an
incorporated municipality, a board, or corporation organized
under the authority of any incorporated municipality in
furnishing or providing street lighting or traffic-control
systems; the use or consumption of telephone services by an
incorporated municipality in providing fire alarm systems; and
the use or consumption of domestic water by an incorporated
municipality in extinguishing fires, explosions, or
conflagrations.
(9)a. The furnishing of natural gas or electricity for
use or consumption as fuel or energy in and for the heating of
commercial aquaculture aeration systems, commercial
greenhouses, pivot irrigation systems, and poultry houses.
b. The exclusion provided in this subdivision shall not
include the furnishing of natural gas or electricity for use
or consumption as fuel or energy in the production of
Page 2

or consumption as fuel or energy in the production of
SB159 Enrolled
industrial hemp or hemp, as defined in Section 2-8-381, or
cannabis, as defined in Section 20-2A-3.
(10) The furnishing of utility services through the use
of a prepaid telephone calling card."
"§40-21-103
The storage, use, or other consumption of utility
services in the State of Alabama is hereby specifically
excluded from the tax herein levied:
(1) Whenever the State of Alabama is prohibited from
taxing such storage, use, or consumption under the
Constitution or laws of the United States of America or the
Constitution of the State of Alabama of 2022;
(2) Whenever any tax relating to the sale, use,
storage, or consumption of said utility services shall be
levied under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 23 of this
title, or under the provisions of Sections 40-23-1 through
40-23-36 or the Alabama Transaction Tax Act of 1992 if enacted
into law;
(3) Whenever the purchase of said utility services
shall have been at a wholesale sale;
(4) Whenever electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water shall have been used or consumed directly in or for the
production, generation, processing, storage, delivery, or
transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic water;
(5) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
compounder in an electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing
or compounding process;
Page 3

or compounding process;
SB159 Enrolled
(6) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy;
(7) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used by a manufacturer or compounder to
chemically convert raw materials prior to the use of such
converted raw materials in an electrolytic or electrothermal
manufacturing or compounding process;
(8) Whenever the sales price of said utility services
shall be included as a part of the gross receipts or gross
sales of a utility subject to the utility gross receipts tax
for the purpose of calculating the utility gross receipts tax
payable by said utility;
100 (9) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
101 other consumption is used or consumed in a process for the
102 isotopic enrichment of uranium and when said electricity is
103 purchased from a subsidiary corporation of the corporation
104 engaged in the isotopic enrichment of uranium; and
105 (10) Whenever utility services are furnished through
106 the use of a prepaid telephone calling card; and
107 (11)a. Whenever natural gas or electricity purchased
108 for storage, use, or other consumption is used or consumed as
109 fuel or energy in commercial aquaculture aeration systems,
110 commercial greenhouses, pivot irrigation systems, and poultry
111 houses.
112 b. The exclusion provided in this subdivision shall not
Page 4

b. The exclusion provided in this subdivision shall not
SB159 Enrolled
113 include natural gas or electricity purchased for storage, use,
114 or other consumption as fuel or energy in the production of
115 industrial hemp or hemp, as defined in Section 2-8-381, or
116 cannabis, as defined in Section 20-2A-3."
117 Section 2. The amendatory language proposed by this
118 act shall be repealed effective August 31, 2029.
119 Section 3. This act shall become effective on September
120 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
SB159 Enrolled
121
122
123
124
125
126
127 ________________________________________________
128 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
129
130
131
132 ________________________________________________
133 Speaker of the House of Representatives
134
135
136 SB159
137 Senate 17-Mar-26
138 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
139 the Senate, as amended.
140
141 Patrick Harris,
142 Secretary.
143
144
145
146
147 House of Representatives
148 Passed: 09-Apr-26
149
150
151
152
153 By: Senator Williams
Page 6